Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.051

Program and fiscal review—Reports. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1372.SL) ***

The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a program and fiscal review of any entity scheduled for termination under this chapter. This program and fiscal review shall be completed and a preliminary report prepared during the calendar year prior to the date established for termination. These reports shall be prepared in the manner set forth in RCW 44.28.071 and 44.28.075. Upon completion of its preliminary report, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall transmit copies of the report to the office of financial management and any affected entity. The final report shall include the response, if any, of the affected entity and the office of financial management in the same manner as set forth in RCW 44.28.088, except the affected entity and the office of financial management shall have sixty days to respond to the report. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall transmit the final report to the legislature, to the state entity affected, to the governor, and to the state library.

[ 2000 c 189 s 4.]